North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-24.3 Preadmission Assessment of Medical Assistance Recipients

50-24.3-01.
Targeted case management. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall establish a targeted case management service for disabled and elderly individuals eligible for benefits under chapter 50-24.1 who are at risk of requiring long-term care services to ensure that an individual is informed of alternatives available to address the individual’s long-term care needs.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 535, § 1; 1987, ch. 581, § 1; 2001, ch. 429, § 1; 2003, ch. 427, § 1.

50-24.3-01.
Targeted case management. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish a targeted case management service for disabled and elderly individuals eligible for benefits under chapter 50-24.1 who are at risk of requiring long-term care services to ensure that an individual is informed of alternatives available to address the individual’s long-term care needs.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 535, § 1; 1987, ch. 581, § 1; 2001, ch. 429, § 1; 2003, ch. 427, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 455, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.3-02.
Assessment process — Professional involvement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 427, § 4.

50-24.3-03.
Department of human services — Targeted case management — Powers and duties. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services has the following powers and duties which it may delegate to any entity that provides targeted case management services approved by the department:

To seek cooperation from other public and private entities in the community that offer services to individuals with disabilities or the elderly.

To provide information and education to the general public regarding availability of targeted case management.

To accept referrals from an interested party including individuals, families, human services program professionals, nursing facility personnel, and acute care facility personnel.

To assess the health and social needs of, and provide targeted case management to, referred individuals who wish to receive this service.

To identify available noninstitutional services to meet the needs of referred individuals.

To prepare an individual care plan for each individual receiving targeted case management services.

To inform referred individuals of the extent to which long-term care services are available, including institutional and community-based services, and of the individual’s opportunity to choose, in consultation with an attending physician, family members, and other interested parties, among the appropriate alternatives that may be available.

To monitor the results of targeted case management and report to each legislative assembly on these results and the cost-effectiveness of these services.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 535, § 3; 1987, ch. 581, § 2; 2001, ch. 429, § 2; 2003, ch. 427, § 2.

50-24.3-03.
Targeted case management — Powers and duties. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services has the following powers and duties which it may delegate to any entity that provides targeted case management services approved by the department:

To seek cooperation from other public and private entities in the community that offer services to individuals with disabilities or the elderly.

To provide information and education to the general public regarding availability of targeted case management.

To accept referrals from an interested party including individuals, families, human services program professionals, nursing facility personnel, and acute care facility personnel.

To assess the health and social needs of, and provide targeted case management to, referred individuals who wish to receive this service.

To identify available noninstitutional services to meet the needs of referred individuals.

To prepare an individual care plan for each individual receiving targeted case management services.

To inform referred individuals of the extent to which long-term care services are available, including institutional and community-based services, and of the individual’s opportunity to choose, in consultation with an attending physician, family members, and other interested parties, among the appropriate alternatives that may be available.

To monitor the results of targeted case management and report to each legislative assembly on these results and the cost-effectiveness of these services.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 535, § 3; 1987, ch. 581, § 2; 2001, ch. 429, § 2; 2003, ch. 427, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 456, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.3-03.1.
Department of human services — Assessment services — Powers and duties. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services has the following powers and duties which it may delegate to any entity that provides assessment services approved by the department:

To seek cooperation from other public and private agencies in the community which offer services to disabled and elderly persons.

To provide information and education to the general public regarding availability of the assessment program.

To accept referrals from individuals, families, human services program professionals, nursing facility personnel, and acute care facility personnel.

To assess the health and social needs of referred individuals.

To identify available noninstitutional services to meet the needs of referred individuals.

To prepare recommendations for individuals receiving assessment program services as to the need for skilled nursing care or other care available in the community.

To inform referred individuals of the extent to which home and community-based services are available and of their opportunity to choose, in consultation with an attending physician and family member, among the appropriate alternatives that may be available.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 427, § 3.

50-24.3-03.1.
Assessment services — Powers and duties. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services has the following powers and duties which it may delegate to any entity that provides assessment services approved by the department:

To seek cooperation from other public and private agencies in the community which offer services to disabled and elderly persons.

To provide information and education to the general public regarding availability of the assessment program.

To accept referrals from individuals, families, human services program professionals, nursing facility personnel, and acute care facility personnel.

To assess the health and social needs of referred individuals.

To identify available noninstitutional services to meet the needs of referred individuals.

To prepare recommendations for individuals receiving assessment program services as to the need for skilled nursing care or other care available in the community.

To inform referred individuals of the extent to which home and community-based services are available and of their opportunity to choose, in consultation with an attending physician and family member, among the appropriate alternatives that may be available.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 427, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 457, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.3-04.
Preadmission assessment of persons. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 514, § 1.

50-24.3-05.
Facility’s duties — Preadmission assessment — Alternative care. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 514, § 1.